District of Columbia statutes.
2-1215.20

Maintenance of base level of city services.

(a)

The District government shall not eliminate or reduce the level of any services customarily provided in the District to any similar geographic area because such area is subject to a BID, and shall continue to provide its customary services and levels of each service to such area notwithstanding that such area is or may be encompassed in a BID unless a reduction in service is part of a District-wide pro rata reduction in services necessitated by fiscal considerations or budgetary priorities.

(b)

Repealed.

May 29, 1996, D.C. Law 11-134, § 20, 43 DCR 1684
renumbered as § 21, Oct. 8, 1997, D.C. Law 12-26, § 2, 44 DCR 4320
Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 2142, 59 DCR 8025
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 9021(b), 61 DCR 9990
1981 Ed., § 1-2290.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-168 added the (a) designation; and added (b).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 repealed (b).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Business Improvement Districts Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-23, September 23, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 5762).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see §§ 9021(b) and 9029 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 9021(b) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 9021(b) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).

Expiration of Law 11-134

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 2-1215.01.

Section 9029 of D.C. Law 20-155 provided that the amendment by § 9021 of the act shall apply as of September 30, 2014.